Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4105
Participant or participant in an insurance arrangement, defined.

Participant or participant in an insurance arrangement shall mean any employer, union, or other organization providing health care services or benefits to its employees or members through an insurance arrangement.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 5.